Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202637-443
Unlawful entry; penalty; owner; prima facie responsible; when.

It is unlawful for a motor vehicle to enter a permit area unless a valid permit is displayed in or on the vehicle in the manner prescribed by the commission. A permit shall be required for entry at any time of the year. Except for hangtag permits, a permit shall be nontransferable and valid only for the motor vehicle for which issued. Any person who operates a motor vehicle in violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor, and the court shall order the confiscation of any permit purchased or used in violation of this section. If the identity of the operator of a motor vehicle in violation of this section cannot be determined, the owner or person in whose name such vehicle is registered shall be held prima facie responsible for such violation and shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 81, § 11;

Laws 1980, LB 723, § 6;

Laws 1983, LB 199, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 167, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1111;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 153;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 38;

Laws 2026, LB1127, § 3.
July 18, 2026
The term "permit area," as used in the statute, is not unconstitutionally vague. State v. Sprague, 213 Neb. 581, 330 N.W.2d 739 (1983).